Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-311.05
Stalking; not applicable to certain conduct.

Sections 28-311.02 to 28-311.04 shall not apply to conduct which occurs during labor picketing.

Laws 1992, LB 1098, § 4;

Laws 1998, LB 218, § 5;

Laws 2025, LB80, § 29.